local/apertium-tr-az/apertium-tr-az.az.dix.xml
      <pardef n="bəslə/mək__vblex">
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>yərəm</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1,/><s n="sg"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>yərəmmi</l>
            <r>mek<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>mərəm</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>məzəmmi</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>yərsən</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>yərsənmi</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>məzsən</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>məzsənmi</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>yər</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>yərmi</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>məz</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>məzmi</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>yərik</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>yərikmi</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>mərik</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>mərikmi</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>yərsiniz</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>yərsinizmi</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>məzsiniz</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>məzsinizmi</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>yərlər</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>yərlərmi</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>məzlər</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          <,p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>məzlərmi</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
      </pardef>



    <pardef n="iç/mək__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ərəm</l>
          <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ərsən</l>
          <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ər</l>
          <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ərik</l>
          <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ərlər</l>
          <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ər</l>
          <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  </pardefs>

    <e lm="içmək"><i>iç</i><par n="iç/mək__vblex"/></e>
